Illinois, session 104th, SB3978.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to assist 7homeowners in this State to retain private housing of their 8choice, to relieve those residents from the burdens of 9extraordinary property tax spikes, and to preserve the 10character and unique qualities of the neighborhoods in which 11they live. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 13context otherwise requires, words and phrases have the 14following meanings.15    "Claimant" means a homeowner who has filed a claim for a 16circuit breaker property tax relief grant under this Act.17    "Claim year" means the calendar year prior to the period 18of time during which a claimant may file an application for 19benefits under this Act.20    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.21    "Federal poverty level" means the federal poverty income 22guidelines as determined annually by the United States   SB3978- 2 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1Department of Health and Human Services and updated 2periodically in the Federal Register by that Department under 3the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).4    "Household" means a claimant or a claimant and his or her 5spouse, if any, living together in the same residence. An 6additional resident may be counted in determining household 7size.8    "Household income" means the combined income of the 9members of a household.10    "Income" means adjusted gross income, properly reportable 11for federal income tax purposes under the provisions of the 12Internal Revenue Code, modified by adding thereto the sum of 13the following amounts to the extent deducted or excluded from 14gross income in the computation of adjusted gross income:15        (1) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued as 16    interest or dividends during the taxable year;17        (2) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by the 18    Illinois Income Tax Act paid for the taxable year;19        (3) An amount equal to all amounts received during the 20    taxable year as an annuity under an annuity, endowment or 21    life insurance contract or under any other contract or 22    agreement;23        (4) An amount equal to the amount of benefits paid 24    under the Federal Social Security Act during the taxable 25    year;26        (5) An amount equal to the amount of benefits paid   SB3978- 3 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1    under the Railroad Retirement Act during the taxable year;2        (6) An amount equal to the total amount of cash public 3    assistance payments received from any governmental agency 4    during the taxable year other than benefits received 5    pursuant to this Act;6        (7) An amount equal to any net operating loss 7    carryover deduction or capital loss carryover deduction 8    during the taxable year; and9        (8) An amount equal to any benefits received under the 10    Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 11    Diseases Act during the taxable year.12    "Income" does not include any distributions or items of 13income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 14subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.15    "Income eligibility limitation" means a household income 16not to exceed 4 times the federal poverty level for the 17household size. As an alternative income valuation, a 18homeowner who is enrolled in any of the following programs may 19be presumed to have household income that does not exceed the 20maximum income limitation for that tax year as required by 21this Section: Aid to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) 22Program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 23(SNAP), both of which are administered by the Department of 24Human Services; the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program 25(LIHEAP), which is administered by the Department of Commerce 26and Economic Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is   SB3978- 4 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1administered by the Department on Aging; and the Senior 2Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral Program.3    "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal 4Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws relating to 5federal income taxes in effect for the year.6    "Property taxes accrued" means the ad valorem property 7taxes levied against a residence, but does not include special 8assessments, interest, or charges for service. In the case of 9real estate improved with a multi-dwelling or multipurpose 10building, "property taxes accrued" means property taxes levied 11against a residence within such a building in an amount equal 12to the same percentage of the total property taxes levied 13against that real estate as improved as the value of the 14residence is to the total value of the building. If the 15building is a condominium, the percentage shall be that set 16forth for each residence in the condominium declaration. If 17the multi-dwelling building is owned and operated as a 18cooperative, the value of an individual residence is the value 19of the interest in the cooperative held by the owner of record 20of the legal or equitable interest, other than a leasehold 21interest, in the cooperative which confers the right to occupy 22that residence. In determining the amount of the grant under 23Section 20, the applicable "property taxes accrued", as 24determined under this Section, are those due and owing for the 25last preceding taxable year.26    In addition, if the residence is a mobile home as defined   SB3978- 5 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1in and subject to the tax imposed by the Mobile Home Local 2Services Tax Act, "property taxes accrued" includes the amount 3of privilege tax paid during the calendar year for which 4benefits are claimed under that Act on that mobile home. If (i) 5the residence is a mobile home, (ii) the resident is the record 6owner of the property upon which the mobile home is located, 7and (iii) the resident is liable for the taxes imposed under 8the Property Tax Code for both the mobile home and the 9property, then "property taxes accrued" includes the amount of 10property taxes paid on both the mobile home and the property 11upon which the mobile home is located.12    "Property tax bill spike" means that the home:13        (1) has not been improved other than by routine 14    maintenance;15        (2) has been classed the same way since the year prior 16    to the last reassessment preceding 2022;17        (3) has had the same owner since the year prior to the 18    last reassessment preceding 2022 or was inherited from the 19    same owner; and 20        (4) has had accrued property taxes for the property 21    grow at least 25% year over year in any single year since 22    the year prior to the last reassessment preceding 2022, 23    for counties of 250,000 or more residents, or 20% year 24    over year in any single year since the year prior to the 25    last reassessment preceding 2022, for any other county.26    "Property tax bill spike" does not include a tax bill   SB3978- 6 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1increase of $500 or less.2    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place occupied in 3this State by a household and so much of the surrounding land 4as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, 5and includes rental residential property owned by the occupant 6within a multipurpose building. If the assessor has 7established a specific legal description for a portion of 8property constituting the residence, then that portion of 9property shall be deemed "residence" for the purposes of this 10Act.11    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 12valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding calendar 13year were levied. 14    Section 15. Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund.15    (a) There is created in the State treasury a Circuit 16Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund.17    (b) The Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund may 18accept funds from the State and from other entities. Once 19grants have been paid, any remaining funds shall be returned 20first to the State and then to other entities that may have 21contributed funds. Other entities that contribute funds may 22elect to leave funds in the Circuit Breaker Property Tax 23Relief Fund for payments related to subsequent tax years.24    (c) Payments from the Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief 25Fund on behalf of or for the benefit of claimants shall be made   SB3978- 7 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1to coincide as closely as possible with the final installment 2of property tax bills and may be issued directly to local 3taxing bodies on behalf of the claimant, provided that the 4property tax bill for claimants is reduced by the amount of 5their claim, whether through an abatement or other means. 6    Section 20. Amount of grant.7    (a) Any individual who is domiciled in this State is 8eligible for and receives either a general homestead exemption 9under Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code or a general 10alternative homestead exemption under Section 15-176 of the 11Property Tax Code, has experienced property tax bill spikes, 12and has an income that meets the income eligibility limitation 13is eligible for a grant of a portion of their bill spike.14    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, the maximum 15amount of grant to which a claimant is entitled is 50% of the 16claimant's tax bill spike.17    (c) If title to the residence is held jointly by the 18claimant with a person who is not a member of his or her 19household, the amount of property taxes accrued used in 20computing the amount of grant to which he or she is entitled 21shall be the same percentage of property taxes accrued as is 22the percentage of ownership held by the claimant in the 23residence. 24    Section 25. Application.  SB3978- 8 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1    (a) The Chief County Assessment Officer shall establish 2the content, required eligibility and identification 3information, use of social security numbers, and manner of 4applying for benefits in a simplified format under this Act.5    (b) Applications for grants under this Act shall be filed 6online.7    (c) Applications must be filed during the time period 8prescribed by the Chief County Assessment Officer. 9    Section 30. Procedure.10    (a) Claims must be filed after January 1 on forms 11prescribed by the Chief County Assessment Officer. No claim 12may be filed more than one year after December 31 of the tax 13year for which the claim is filed.14    (b) The right to file a claim under this Act shall be 15personal to the claimant and shall not survive his death, but 16such right may be exercised on behalf of a claimant by his 17legal guardian or attorney-in-fact. If a claimant dies after 18having filed a timely claim, the amount thereof shall be 19disbursed on behalf of a person who inherited title to the 20house, provided that such person resided with the claimant at 21the time he or she filed the claim.22    (c) Only one member of a household may file a claim under 23this Act in any calendar year. If both members of a household 24are otherwise entitled to claim a grant under this Act, they 25must agree as to which of them will file a claim for that year.  SB3978- 9 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1    (d) A person may not under any circumstances charge a fee 2to a claimant under this Act for assistance in completing an 3application form for a property tax relief grant under this 4Act. 5    Section 35. Administration.6    (a) Upon receipt of a timely filed claim, the Chief County 7Assessment Officer shall determine whether the claimant is a 8person entitled to a grant under this Act and the amount of 9grant to which he is entitled under this Act. The Chief County 10Assessment Officer may require the claimant to furnish 11reasonable proof of the statements of domicile, household 12income, property taxes accrued and other matters on which 13entitlement is based, and may withhold approval of a grant 14until such additional proof is furnished. If the Chief County 15Assessment Officer provides such information from other 16records available to them, the claimant may rebut or augment 17such information.18    (b) The Chief County Assessment Officer shall deny claims 19which have been fraudulently prepared or when he or she finds 20that the claimant has acquired title to his residence or has 21paid rent for his residence primarily for the purpose of 22receiving a grant under this Act.23    (c) Upon request, the Comptroller shall transfer funds 24from the fund to be held by the county for payment on behalf of 25homeowners. In the first year that a county requests funds,   SB3978- 10 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1the Comptroller shall transfer, from funds available in the 2fund, $10 per residential parcel in the county to be held in 3the county. To the extent that funds are received from a 4County, those funds may be transferred only to be used in that 5county. A county may request additional funds with a showing 6of greater eligibility. In a subsequent year, the Comptroller 7shall transfer sufficient funds such that, together with 8unused funds retained from a prior year, the county is holding 9the greater of $10 per residential parcel or the amount needed 10for the immediately prior year. To the extent that the 11Comptroller is required to transfer funds, the transfer shall 12occur, if possible, at least 15 days before the date when the 13final installment tax bills are scheduled to be mailed under 14Article 21 of this Code. Any funds not used as provided in this 15Act shall be returned to the Fund after 3 years. 16    Section 40. Payment and denial of claims.17    (a) In general. The Fund shall make payments, from 18appropriations made for that purpose of grants to claimants 19under this Act and from other entities, in the amounts to which 20the Chief County Assessment Officer has determined they are 21entitled, respectively. If a claim is denied, the Chief County 22Assessment Officer shall cause written notice of that denial 23and the reasons for that denial to be sent to the claimant.24    (b) Payment of claims one dollar and under. Where the 25amount of the grant computed under Section 20 is less than one   SB3978- 11 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1dollar, the claimant shall receive one dollar.2    (c) Right to appeal. Any person aggrieved by an action or 3determination arising under this Act may request in writing 4reconsideration of that action or determination, setting out 5the facts upon which the request is based. 6    Section 45. Fraud; error.7    (a) Any person who files a fraudulent claim for a grant 8under this Act, who for compensation prepares a claim for a 9grant and knowingly enters false information on an application 10for any claimant under this Act, who fraudulently files 11multiple applications, or who files a fraudulent request for 12payment is guilty of a Class 4 felony for the first offense and 13is guilty of a Class 3 felony for each subsequent offense.14    (b) The Department may recover from a claimant any amount 15paid to that claimant under this Act on account of an erroneous 16or fraudulent claim, together with 6% interest per year. 17Amounts recoverable from a claimant by the Department under 18this Act may, but need not, be recovered by offsetting the 19amount owed against any future grant payable to the person 20under this Act.21    (c) A prosecution for a violation of this Section may be 22commenced at any time within 3 years of the commission of that 23violation. 24    Section 50. Arrangements. No inference, implication, or   SB3978- 12 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1presumption of legislative construction shall be drawn or made 2by reason of the location or grouping of any particular 3Section or provision of this Act. 4    Section 55. Severability. If any clause, sentence, 5Section, provision or part of this Act or the application 6thereof to any person or circumstance shall be adjudged to be 7unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act or its application 8to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is 9held invalid, shall not be affected thereby. 10    Section 60. Rules.11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, 12the Chief County Assessment Officer may adopt rules regarding 13applications, proof of eligibility, required identification 14information, use of social security numbers, and counting of 15income.16    (b) The Chief County Assessment Officer may, subject to 17appropriations made for that purpose:18        (1) attempt to secure the cooperation of appropriate 19    federal, State and local agencies in securing the names 20    and addresses of persons to whom this Act pertains;21        (2) prepare a mailing list of persons eligible for 22    grants under this Act; and23        (3) secure the cooperation of the Department of 24    Revenue, other State agencies, local business   SB3978- 13 -LRB104 19656 HLH 33105 b1    establishments, and interest groups to educate the public 2    about the application process under this Act to those 3    eligible to file claims. 4    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.